Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1114.03
County officers; salaries; Class 2 counties.

In counties of Class 2, the county clerk, assessor, treasurer, sheriff, attorney, and appointive full-time veterans service officer shall each receive a minimum annual salary of six thousand dollars, and in counties entitled by law to have a clerk of the district court, the clerk of the district court shall receive a minimum annual salary of fifty-four hundred dollars, to be paid periodically as other county employees out of the general fund.

Laws 1961, c. 96, § 3, p. 325;

Laws 1963, c. 113, § 6, p. 445;

Laws 1967, c. 128, § 3, p. 410;

Laws 1967, c. 127, § 2, p. 407;

Laws 1969, c. 164, § 2, p. 739;

Laws 1971, LB 574, § 3;

Laws 1972, LB 1157, § 2;

Laws 1973, LB 220, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 7.